California, session 20252026, SB768.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 68652 is added to the Government Code, to read:68652.  (a) Each court shall report to the Judicial Council every month the total number of each of the following data points for unlawful detainer cases, aggregated by the ZIP Code of the premises in the lawsuit:(1) Cases filed each month.(2) Cases in which defendants were represented by counsel at case resolution, including, but not limited to, at the point of settlement or the point when a decision was made at trial. (3) Cases in which landlords were represented by counsel at case resolution, including, but not limited to, at the point of settlement or when a decision was made at trial.(4) Cases that were subject to default, stipulated, or other types of pretrial judgments.(5) Cases that went to trial, and of those cases that went to trial, how many were a bench trial and how many were a jury trial.(6) Cases that were dismissed before trial at the plaintiff’s request.(7) Cases that resulted in a judgment for the plaintiff or for the defendant.(b) The data points provided to the Judicial Council pursuant to subdivision (a) shall only pertain to unlawful detainer cases filed on or after January 1, 2026.(c) Every four months, the Judicial Council shall post all information received pursuant to subdivision (a) in a publicly available electronic spreadsheet that may be downloaded from its internet website.SECTION 1.Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 156) is added to Title 1 of Part 1 of the Code of Civil Procedure, to read:8.Eviction Proceedings156.The Judicial Council shall collect information from the trial courts on the number of eviction proceedings initiated, the number of tenants represented by counsel, and the number of landlords represented by counsel. The Judicial Council shall make this data publicly available online yearly, and shall ensure that it can be viewed by geographic region. The Judicial Council shall annually report this data to the Legislature commencing July 1, 2026.